da: Elektronik > Arkadeudstyr > Flipperspil – tilbehør: Mærkater og grafikstriber; Flipperdele; Benjusterere (nivelleringsfødder); Belysningssæt; Playfield-modifikationer; Playfield-plastikdele; Playfield-voks; Beskyttende dæksler; Erstatningsbolde; Udskiftningspærer; Gummiringsæt; Skydestænger; Topdele
fr: Appareil électronique > Matériel d’arcade > Accessoires pour flippers: Autocollants et lames décoratives; Pièces pour flippers; Régleurs de pieds; Kits d’éclairage; Modifications de plateaux de jeu; Plastiques de plateaux de jeu; Cires pour plateaux de jeu; Housses de protection; Billes de rechange; Ampoules de rechange; Kits d’anneaux en caoutchouc; Tiges de lancement; Toppers de flipper
nl: Elektronica > Arcadeapparatuur > Accessoires voor flipperkasten: Stickers en art blades; Flipperonderdelen; Pootvatters; Verlichtingskits; Speelveldmodificaties; Speelveld plastic onderdelen; Speelveldwas; Beschermhoezen; Vervangende ballen; Vervangende gloeilampen; Rubberen ringenkits; Shooter-stangen; Toppers
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Equipamento de máquinas de jogo > Acessórios de máquina de pinball: Autocolantes e lâminas artísticas; Peças de flipper; Niveladores de pernas; Kits de iluminação; Modificações do campo de jogo; Plásticos do campo de jogo; Ceras de campo de jogo; Capas protetoras; Bolas de substituição; Lâmpadas de substituição; Kits de anéis de borracha; Varetas de lançamento; Toppers
tr: Elektronik > Atari Ekipmanları > Tilt Makinesi Aksesuarları: Çıkartmalar ve Art Blade yan paneller; Flipper Parçaları; Ayak Dengeleyicileri (Nivelleme Ayakları); Aydınlatma Kitleri; Oyun Alanı Değişiklikleri; Oyun Alanı Plastik Parçaları; Oyun Alanı Mumları; Koruyucu Örtüler; Yedek Toplar; Yedek Ampuller; Kauçuk Halka Kitleri; Atış Çubukları; Üst Süslemeler
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Εξοπλισμός Arcade > Αξεσουάρ φλίπερ: Αυτοκόλλητα & καλλιτεχνικά φύλλα; Ανταλλακτικά φλίπερ; Αλφάδια ποδιών; Σετ φωτισμού; Τροποποιήσεις πεδίου παιχνιδιού; Πλαστικά πεδίου παιχνιδιού; Κεριά επιφάνειας παιχνιδιού; Προστατευτικά καλύμματα; Ανταλλακτικές μπάλες; Ανταλλακτικοί λαμπτήρες; Σετ δακτυλίων από καουτσούκ; Ράβδοι εκτόξευσης; Διακοσμητικά κορυφής
pl: Elektronika > Sprzęt do gier zręcznościowych > Akcesoria do flipperów: Naklejki i ostrza artystyczne; Części flipperów; Wyrównywacze nóg; Zestawy oświetleniowe; Modyfikacje blatu gry; Plastiki blatu gry; Woski do fliperów; Osłony ochronne; Kulki zapasowe; Żarówki zastępcze; Zestawy pierścieni gumowych; Pręty do strzału; Ozdoby czołowe
ru: Электроника > Игровые автоматы > Аксессуары для автоматов для игры в пинбол: Декали и арт-панели; Детали флипперов; Регулировочные опоры ножек; Комплекты освещения; Модификации игрового поля; Пластиковые элементы игрового поля; Воск для игрового поля; Защитные чехлы; Запасные шары; Запасные лампы; Комплекты резиновых колец; Пусковые штоки; Декоративные топперы
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Thiết bị game thùng > Phụ kiện máy chơi đỡ bóng: Decal và tấm ốp Art Blade; Linh kiện cánh đẩy (flipper); Chân tăng chỉnh; Bộ đèn chiếu sáng; Tùy biến mặt bàn chơi; Nhựa mặt bàn chơi; Sáp lau máy chơi; Bọc bảo vệ; Bóng thay thế; Bóng đèn thay thế; Bộ vành cao su; Cần bắn bi; Trang trí đỉnh máy
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อาร์เคด > อุปกรณ์เครื่องพินบอล: สติกเกอร์และแผ่นศิลปะตัวเครื่อง; ชิ้นส่วนครีบตีลูก; ตัวปรับระดับขา; ชุดไฟ; ชิ้นส่วนดัดแปลงพื้นเล่น; ชิ้นส่วนพลาสติกพื้นเล่น; แว็กซ์เคลือบพื้นผิวสำหรับเล่น; ที่เก็บแบบป้องกัน; ลูกบอลสำรอง; หลอดไฟทดแทน; ชุดแหวนยาง; คันยิงลูกบอล; ชิ้นส่วนตกแต่งด้านบน
hu: Elektronika > Arcade berendezések > Flippergép-kiegészítők: Matricák és művészi panelek; Flipper alkatrészek; Lábszintezők; Világítókészletek; Játékmező-módosítások; Játékmező-műanyagok; Játékterületi viaszok; Védőburkolatok; Cserelabdák; Csereizzók; Gumigyűrűkészletek; Kilövőrudak; Tetődíszek
en: Electronics > Arcade Equipment > Pinball Machine Accessories: Decals & Art Blades; Flipper Parts; Leg Levelers; Lighting Kits; Playfield Modifications; Playfield Plastics; Playfield Waxes; Protective Covers; Replacement Balls; Replacement Light Bulbs; Rubber Ring Kits; Shooter Rods; Toppers
sl-SI: Elektronika > Oprema za arkadne igre > Dodatki za fliperje: Nalepke in umetniške obloge; Deli za fliper; Izravnalniki nog; Kompleti za razsvetljavo; Modifikacije igralne površine; Plastični elementi igralne površine; Voski za igralne površine; Zaščitne prevleke; Nadomestne krogle; Nadomestne žarnice; Kompleti gumijastih obročev; Izstrelitvene palice; Nadstavki
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 街機設備 > 彈珠台配件: 貼花及美工刀; 彈珠台翻轉零件; 腿部調平器; 照明工具包; 遊戲場地改裝; 遊戲場地塑膠件; 面板保護蠟; 保護蓋; 替換彈珠; 替換燈泡; 橡膠圈工具包; 射擊桿; 頂部飾件
it: Elettronica > Attrezzature giochi arcade > Accessori per flipper: Decalcomanie e lame artistiche; Parti del flipper; Livellatori per gambe; Kit di illuminazione; Modifiche al campo di gioco; Plastiche del campo di gioco; Cere per campo da gioco; Coperture protettive; Palline di ricambio; Lampadine di ricambio; Kit anelli di gomma; Aste di lancio; Cupole decorative
ja: 電子機器 > アーケードゲーム > ピンボールマシン関連用品: デカールとアートブレード; フリッパー部品; レッグレベラー; 照明キット; プレイフィールド改造パーツ; プレイフィールド用プラスチック; プレイフィールドワックス; 保護カバー; 替え玉; 交換用電球; ゴムリングキット; シューターロッド; トッパー
sv: Elektronik > Spelhallsutrustning > Tillbehör till flipperspel: Dekaler och konstblad; Flipperdelar; Benjusterare; Belysningsenheter; Spelplansmodifieringar; Spelplansplastdelar; Playfield-vaxer; Skyddsöverdrag; Ersättningsbollar; Ersättningsglödlampor; Gummiringenheter; Skjutstänger; Toppdekorationer
nb: Elektronikk > Spilleutstyr > Tilbehør til flipperspill: Klistremerker og kunstblader; Flipperdeler; Beinnivellering; Lyssett; Spillefeltmodifikasjoner; Spillefeltplast; Voks for spillområdet; Beskyttelsesdeksler; Erstatningsballer; Erstatningslyskilder; Gummiringsett; Avfyringshåndtak; Toppers
ro-RO: Electronice > Echipamente jocuri arcade > Accesorii pentru aparate de pinball: Autocolante și lame artistice; Piese pentru flipper; Nivelatoare pentru picioare; Seturi de iluminat; Modificări ale platoului de joc; Piese din plastic pentru platoul de joc; Ceruri pentru suprafața de joc; Huse de protecție; Bile de schimb; Becuri de schimb; Seturi de inele de cauciuc; Tije de lansare; Ornamente superioare
de: Elektronik > Spielautomatenbedarf > Flipper-Zubehör: Aufkleber und Kunstblätter; Flipper-Teile; Nivellierfüße; Beleuchtungskits; Spielfeld-Modifikationen; Spielfeld-Kunststoffteile; Spielfeld-Wachse; Schutzabdeckungen; Ersatzkugeln; Ersatzlampen; Gummiringsätze; Abschussstangen; Aufsätze
sk-SK: Elektronika > Arkádové vybavenie > Príslušenstvo k pinballovým automatom: Nálepky a ozdobné panely; Diely pliptrov; Vyrovnávače nôh; Súpravy osvetlenia; Úpravy hracieho poľa; Plastové prvky hracieho poľa; Vosky na hracie automaty; Ochranné kryty; Náhradné lopty; Náhradné žiarovky; Súpravy gumených krúžkov; Páky na strieľanie guľôčok; Horné ozdoby
lt-LT: Elektronika > Arkadų įranga > Pinbolo automatų priedai: Lipdukai ir meno plokštės; Fliperių dalys; Kojų lygiavimo detalės; Apšvietimo rinkiniai; Žaidimo lauko modifikacijos; Žaidimo lauko plastikai; Žaidimų lauko vaškas; Apsauginiai dangteliai; Pakaitiniai rutuliukai; Pakaitinės lemputės; Guminių žiedų rinkiniai; Paleidimo svirtelės; Viršutinės dekoracijos
ko: 전자기기 > 아케이드 장비 > 핀볼머신 부대용품: 데칼 및 아트 블레이드; 플리퍼 부품; 다리 레벨러; 조명 키트; 플레이필드 개조품; 플레이필드 플라스틱; 필드용 왁스; 보호용 덮개; 교체용 볼; 교체용 전구; 고무링 키트; 슈터 로드; 토퍼
cs: Elektronika > Vybavení arkádových videoheren > Doplňky k automatům na pinball: Samolepky a ozdobné lišty; Díly páček; Vyrovnávače nohou; Osvětlovací soupravy; Úpravy hracího pole; Plastové díly hracího pole; Vosky na hrací plochu; Ochranné kryty; Náhradní kuličky; Náhradní žárovky; Sady gumových kroužků; Střelecké tyče; Vrchní ozdoby
bg-BG: Електроника > Оборудване за аркадни машини > Аксесоари за флипер машина: Стикери и декоративни панели; Части за флипер; Регулатори за крака; Комплекти за осветление; Модификации на игралното поле; Пластмаси за игралното поле; Восъци за игралното поле; Защитни капаци; Резервни топки; Резервни крушки; Комплекти гумени пръстени; Лостове на изстрелвачи; Табла за декорация за флипер
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Equipamento para Arcade > Acessórios para fliperamas: Decalques e lâminas de arte; Peças de flippers; Niveladores de pés; Kits de iluminação; Modificações de campo de jogo; Plásticos de campo de jogo; Ceras para campo de jogo; Capas protetoras; Bolas de reposição; Lâmpadas de substituição; Kits de anéis de borracha; Hastes de lançamento; Toppers
es: Electrónica > Artículos para videojuegos > Accesorios para máquinas de pinball: Calcomanías y láminas artísticas; Piezas de flipper; Niveladores de patas; Kits de iluminación; Modificaciones de campo de juego; Plásticos del campo de juego; Ceras para el campo de juego; Fundas protectoras; Bolas de repuesto; Bombillas de repuesto; Kits de anillos de goma; Varillas de lanzamiento; Toppers
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 大型游戏机/街机 > 弹球机配件: 贴花和艺术贴片; 弹板部件; 支腿调平器; 照明套件; 游戏台面改装件; 游戏台面塑料件; 游乐场蜡; 保护罩; 替换球; 替换灯泡; 橡胶圈套件; 发射杆; 顶饰
fi: Elektroniikka > Pelikonetarvikkeet > Flipperikoneen lisätarvikkeet: Tarra ja taidepaneeli; Väänninosa; Jalkatason tasain; Valaistussarjat; Pelikentän muokkaus; Pelikentän muoviosat; Kenttävahat; Suojakotelot; Vaihtopallot; Vaihtolamppuvalo; Kumirengassarjat; Laukaisijavarsi; Päällikoristekokonaisuus
hr-HR: Elektronika > Oprema za arkadne igre > Pribor za flipere: Naljepnice i ukrašene poluge; Dijelovi flipera; Nivelatori nogu; Kompleti za rasvjetu; Modifikacije igrališta; Plastični dijelovi igrališta; Voskovi za igrališta; Zaštitne navlake; Zamjenske lopte; Zamjenske žarulje; Kompleti gumenih prstenova; Palice za lansiranje; Toperi